Indiana, session 2026, HB1075.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-26-22 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 22. Mental Health and Substance Use Disorder
Screening
Sec. 1. (a) Each school corporation and charter school shall
develop a plan to conduct developmentally appropriate evidence
based:
(1) mental health screening; and
(2) substance use disorder screening;
for students in kindergarten through grade 12.
(b) A mental health screening under this chapter must include
screening for the following:
(1) High risk for later violence.
(2) Resilience.
Sec. 2. Each school corporation and charter school shall notify
a student's parent, if the student is an unemancipated minor, of the
2026 IN 1075—LS 6116/DI 110


plan to conduct a screening described in section 1 of this chapter,
including the:
(1) purpose of the screening; and
(2) approximate date and time the screening will be
conducted.
Sec. 3. A school corporation or charter school may not conduct
a mental health screening or substance use disorder screening of a
student under this chapter without the consent of:
(1) the student, if the student is an adult or emancipated
minor; or
(2) a parent of the student, if the student is an unemancipated
minor.
Sec. 4. (a) If a student is an unemancipated minor, a school
corporation or charter school shall:
(1) notify the student's parent of any results from a mental
health screening or substance use disorder screening under
this chapter;
(2) provide the parent a copy of the results; and
(3) if applicable, provide the parent a list of resources
available to the student in the school or community.
(b) If the student is an adult or emancipated minor, the school
corporation or charter school shall provide the student with the
information described in subsection (a).
Sec. 5. (a) The department shall make available to a school
corporation and charter school:
(1) developmentally appropriate evidence based:
(A) mental health screening tools; and
(B) substance use disorder screening tools; and
(2) other applicable developmentally appropriate evidence
based resources;
to assist the school corporation and charter school with
implementing mental health screening and substance use disorder
screening under this chapter.
(b) The department shall consult with the division of mental
health and addiction in selecting evidence based screening tools
and resources under this section.
Sec. 6. A school corporation or charter school may not use the
results of a mental health screening or substance use disorder
screening to make any decision relating to the student's instruction,
academic opportunities, or discipline.
Sec. 7. Except as otherwise provided under federal or state law,
if the results of a screening under this chapter indicate additional
2026 IN 1075—LS 6116/DI 110


care is needed for the student, the school corporation or charter
school is not responsible for providing the additional care to the
student.
Sec. 8. Any records relating to a mental health screening or
substance use disorder screening must be maintained in
accordance with any applicable federal privacy laws.
Sec. 9. Unless otherwise provided under federal law, any mental
health screening or substance use disorder screening data collected
by a school corporation or charter school under this chapter must
be destroyed by the earlier of the following:
(1) The date that the school corporation or charter school
notifies a student's parent or the student of the results as
required under section 4 of this chapter.
(2) Sixty (60) days after the date that the school corporation
or charter school obtains the results of the mental health
screening or substance use disorder screening.
2026 IN 1075—LS 6116/DI 110